Utah statutes.
17-2-102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Consolidating county" means the county to which another county is joined or is proposed to be joined by consolidation under this part.

(2)  "Originating county" means the county that is joined or proposed to be joined to another county by consolidation under this part.



Enacted by Chapter 350, 2009 General Session

